Illinois, session 104th, HB1538.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sanitary District Act of 1917 is amended by 5changing Section 7.9 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 2405/7.9)7    Sec. 7.9. Private agreements for wastewater treatment. 8    (a) The board of trustees of the Sanitary District of 9Decatur or the Bloomington and Normal Water Reclamation 10District may enter into an agreement to sell, convey, or 11disburse treated wastewater to a private entity located within 1250 miles of the District's boundaries. The agreement may not 13exceed 30 years. The Sanitary District of Decatur or the 14Bloomington and Normal Water Reclamation District may also 15accept wastewater for treatment from a private entity located 16within 50 miles of the district's boundaries.17    (b) In addition, the Sanitary District of Decatur or the 18Bloomington and Normal Water Reclamation District may acquire 19and accept, by gift, grant, purchase, or otherwise, pursuant 20to its authority under this Act, fee simple interest or any 21lesser interest as may be desired in real property necessary 22to carry out its powers under this Section. 23    (c) This Section does not apply to private entities   HB1538 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09143 RTM 19199 b1located outside of the State. 2(Source: P.A. 94-1109, eff. 2-23-07.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.